North Carolina statutes. Chapter 114. Department of Justice.
Article 3. Division of Criminal Information. [Repealed]

§§ 114-10 through 114-10.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-902

through 143B-905 by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(h), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-11.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1190, s. 57.

§ 114-11.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 310, s. 4.

§§ 114-11.2 through 114-11.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.